Tennessee, session 114, SB0628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-6-101, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
The department of economic and community development shall submit an
annual report to the finance, ways and means committee of the senate and the
committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matters
pertaining to finance that includes the names of the municipalities involved in the
creation of an authority in the prior fiscal year, the amount of land acquired and
improved, specific details about the financing of the project, and any other information
the department deems relevant.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0628
001765
- 1 -